New York, session 2025-2026, A465.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public service law is amended by adding a new section 2 66-x to read as follows: 3 § 66-x. Resilient electric vehicle charging system pilot program. 1. 4 For the purposes of this section: 5 (a) "Resilient carbon free power generation" shall mean only those 6 electric generating facilities which: 7 (i) are connected to the electric system and operated in conjunction 8 with an electric corporation's transmission and distribution system; 9 (ii) are operated in compliance with any standards and requirements 10 established pursuant to this section; 11 (iii) have black start and disconnect capability; and 12 (iv) do not require the use of fossil fuels. 13 (b) "Resilient electric vehicle charging system" shall mean an elec- 14 tric vehicle (EV) microgrid designed to provide uninterrupted electric 15 service for electric vehicle charging throughout an extended outage. 16 (c) "Extended outage" shall mean an outage of the electric distrib- 17 ution system that continues for a period of twenty-four hours or longer. 18 (d) "Uninterrupted" shall mean that the resilient electric vehicle 19 charging system generates electricity throughout an extended outage. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02925-02-6 A. 465--A 2 1 (e) "EV microgrid" is a group of energy generating resources using 2 resilient carbon free power generation and energy storage within clearly 3 defined electrical boundaries that acts as a single controllable entity 4 with respect to the grid. 5 2. The chair shall promulgate such rules, policies, and procedures 6 necessary and appropriate for creating a resilient electric vehicle 7 charging system pilot program to facilitate electric vehicle charging 8 with a focus on emergency response needs during extended outages. Any 9 such pilot program shall be established using existing financial 10 resources. 11 § 2. No later than December 30, 2029, the public service commission 12 shall prepare and publish a report outlining at a minimum: (a) the 13 number of unique instances when a resilient electric vehicle charging 14 system provided power during an extended outage; (b) the actual costs of 15 the pilot program; and (c) any additional information relevant to 16 assessing program effectiveness. Such report may be incorporated into 17 other reports required of the public service commission. 18 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 19 deemed repealed April 1, 2030.